Washington statutes.
RCW 15.60.010

Apiary advisory committee.

The director may establish an apiary advisory committee including members representing the major segments of the apiary industry including commercial and noncommercial beekeepers, representatives from the Washington State University apiary program or cooperative extension, and receivers of pollination services as deemed appropriate.

The committee shall advise the director on administration of this chapter and issues affecting the apiary industry. The committee may also advise the director on the funding of research projects of benefit to the apiary industry.

The committee shall meet at the call of the director. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in attending meetings of the committee and any other official duty authorized by the director, pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2000 c 100 s 2; 1994 c 178 s 3; 1993 c 89 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 16; 1961 c 11 s 15.60.010. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 59 s 1; RRS s 3170-1; prior: 1919 c 116 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.